Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB895.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1311(b) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1311. Registration card to be signed and exhibited on demand.* * *(b) Carrying and exhibiting card.--Every registration card shall, at all times while the vehicle is being operated upon a highway, be in the possession of the person driving or in control of the vehicle or carried in the vehicle and shall be exhibited upon demand of any police officer. Proof of registration may be satisfied under this chapter by production of a registration card in paper or electronic form.* * *123456789101112131415161718 (d) Immunity.--If a registrant chooses to provide proof of financial responsibility to be viewed in an electronic format on an electronic device under section 1786 (relating to required financial responsibility), a police officer administering this subchapter in good faith shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability which arises from the insured's choice, including the inadvertent viewing of materials on the device other than the proof of financial responsibility, inadvertent deletion of information from the device, inadvertent interception of a communication while in possession of the device and breakage which occurs to the device.Section 2. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The amendment of 75 Pa.C.S. § 1311(b) shall take effect in 12 months.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0895PN1016 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617